src/morphology/affixes/propernoun.lexc
! ============ !
! Proper nouns !
! ============ !

! Table of content
! ================
! - The morphological tags
! - - Male first names
! - - Female first names
! - - Surnames
! - - Place names and other names



! The morphological tags
! ======================

! For each group, the maltag etc. lexicon functions as a default
! lexicon. The other lexica are there for specific subgroups of the names.

! Indeclineables
! --------------

LEXICON indeclattr
+Det+Prop+Attr: # ; ! "The" i "The full Monty"

LEXICON indeclorg ! Den Danske Bank
+N+Prop+Org: indeclcase ;

LEXICON indeclplc ! Færøerne
+N+Prop+Plc: indeclcase ;

LEXICON indeclcase
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Sg+Dat: # ;
+Sg+Gen: # ;


! Male first names
! ----------------

!this is like BOAS
!It means just "not checked"
LEXICON maltag
+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;
sdóttir+N+Prop+Fem+Sg:sdótt kv30e ;
ssonur+N+Prop+Mal+Sg:sson k47 ;
sonur+N+Prop+Mal+Sg:son k47 ;

LEXICON MUSTAFA
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: # ;
dóttir+N+Prop+Sg:dótt kv30e ;
sonur+N+Prop+Sg:son k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>sa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON ARI
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>a # ;
adóttir+N+Prop+Sg:adótt kv30e ;
asonur+N+Prop+Sg:ason k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON HARRIGUD 
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Def:%>an # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat+Def:%>anum # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ans # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON WILLY
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;
sdóttir+N+Prop+Sg:sdótt kv30e ;
ssonur+N+Prop+Sg:sson k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>sa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON DAGUR
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:ur # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;
sdóttir+N+Prop+Sg:sdótt kv30e ;
ssonur+N+Prop+Sg:sson k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON TRÓNDUR
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:ur # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>ar # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s # ; ! XXX s-gen?
ardóttir+N+Prop+Sg:ardótt kv30e ;
arsonur+N+Prop+Sg:arson k47 ;
sdóttir+N+Prop+Sg:sdótt kv30e ;
ssonur+N+Prop+Sg:sson k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON HÁVARÐUR
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:ur # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>ar # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;
sdóttir+N+Prop+Sg:sdótt kv30e ;
ardóttir+N+Prop+Sg:ardótt kv30e ;
ssonur+N+Prop+Sg:sson k47 ;
arsonur+N+Prop+Sg:arson k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON DÁVUR
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:ur # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>a # ;
adóttir+N+Prop+Sg:adótt kv30e ;
asonur+N+Prop+Sg:ason k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON BOAS
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>ar # ;
ardóttir+N+Prop+Sg:ardótt kv30e ;
arsonur+N+Prop+Sg:arson k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON BJØRN
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;  !birni, fix
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>ar # ; !bjarnar
ardóttir+N+Prop+Sg:ardótt kv30e ;
arsonur+N+Prop+Sg:arson k47 ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM


! Female first names
! ------------------
LEXICON RUT
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>ar # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON SARA
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>sa # ; !SAFORM

LEXICON ASTA
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc:%>u # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>u # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>u # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>usa # ; !SAFORM

! LEXICON SIV
! LEXICON ø>a


! Surnames
! --------


LEXICON surtag
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;        ! ..ssoni
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%^IUML%>i # ;  ! ..ssyni
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Poss:%>asa # ; !SAFORM

! Place names and other names
! ---------------------------
LEXICON plctag
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;

LEXICON fplctag !fem
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>ar # ;

LEXICON orgtag ! XXXcheck
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;

LEXICON mscorgtag ! XXXcheck
+N+Prop+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Prop+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Prop+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Prop+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
! Sosialurin

LEXICON neuorgtag ! XXXcheck
+N+Prop+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Prop+Neu: S-N-SGDG ;
! eimskip


LEXICON ROMA
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:%>a # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc:%>u # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>u # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>u # ;

LEXICON plcpl
+N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Nom:%>ar # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Acc:%>ar # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Dat:%>um # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Gen:%>a # ;


LEXICON SUDUROY

+N+Prop+Sg+Nom+Indef:%> # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Indef:%> # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat+Indef:%> # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ina # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Dat+Def:%>nni # ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar # ;

LEXICON FLOKKUR
flokkur:flokk propnoun-org-k9 ;

! These are the lexica taken from the noun-fao-lex.txt file.


LEXICON propnoun-h-flt10
 +N+Prop:    h-flt10 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h-flt25
 +N+Prop:    h-flt25 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h-flt8
 +N+Prop:    h-flt8 ;

LEXICON propnoun-plc-h11
 +N+Prop+Plc:    h11 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h11
 +N+Prop:    h11 ;

LEXICON propnoun-plc-h11e
 +N+Prop+Plc:    h11e ;

LEXICON propnoun-h11e
 +N+Prop:    h11e ;

LEXICON propnoun-h13
 +N+Prop:    h13 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h13e
 +N+Prop:    h13e ;

LEXICON propnoun-h1e
 +N+Prop:    h1e ;

LEXICON propnoun-h24
 +N+Prop:    h24 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h24e
 +N+Prop:    h24e ;

LEXICON propnoun-h25
 +N+Prop:    h25 ;

LEXICON propnoun-plc-h3
 +N+Prop+Plc:    h3 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h3
 +N+Prop:    h3 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h3e
 +N+Prop:    h3e ;

LEXICON propnoun-h4
 +N+Prop:    h4 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h4e
 +N+Prop:    h4e ;

LEXICON propnoun-h5
 +N+Prop:    h5 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h5e
 +N+Prop:    h5e ;

LEXICON propnoun-h8
 +N+Prop:    h8 ;

LEXICON propnoun-h8e
 +N+Prop:    h8e ;

LEXICON propnoun-k-flt17
 +N+Prop:    k-flt17 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k-flt20
 +N+Prop:    k-flt20 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k1
 +N+Prop:    k1 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k12
 +N+Prop:    k12 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k14
 +N+Prop:    k14 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k17
 +N+Prop:    k17 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k1e
 +N+Prop:    k1e ;

LEXICON propnoun-k21
 +N+Prop:    k21 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k3
 +N+Prop:    k3 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k39e
 +N+Prop:    k39e ;

LEXICON propnoun-k3e
 +N+Prop:    k3e ;

LEXICON propnoun-k43e
 +N+Prop:    k43e ;

LEXICON propnoun-k46
 +N+Prop:    k46 ;

LEXICON propnoun-plc-k6
 +N+Prop+Plc:    k6 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k6
 +N+Prop:    k6 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k7
 +N+Prop:    k7 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k8
 +N+Prop:    k8 ;

LEXICON propnoun-k9
 +N+Prop:    k9 ;

LEXICON propnoun-org-k9
 +N+Prop+Org:    k9 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv-flt1
 +N+Prop:    kv-flt1 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv-flt17
 +N+Prop:    kv-flt17 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv-flt2
 +N+Prop:    kv-flt2 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv-flt32
 +N+Prop:    kv-flt32 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv-flt6
 +N+Prop:    kv-flt6 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv-flt8
 +N+Prop:    kv-flt8 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv-flt9
 +N+Prop:    kv-flt9 ;

LEXICON propnoun-org-kv1
 +N+Prop+Org:    kv1 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv1
 +N+Prop:    kv1 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv12e
 +N+Prop:    kv12e ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv13e
 +N+Prop:    kv13e ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv1e
 +N+Prop:    kv1e ;

LEXICON propnoun-fem-kv2
 +N+Prop+Fem:    kv2 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv2
 +N+Prop:    kv2 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv21
 +N+Prop:    kv21 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv2e
 +N+Prop:    kv2e ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv3
 +N+Prop:    kv3 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv32e
 +N+Prop:    kv32e ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv3e
 +N+Prop:    kv3e ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv6
 +N+Prop:    kv6 ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv6e
 +N+Prop:    kv6e ;

LEXICON propnoun-kv9
 +N+Prop:    kv9 ;
