src/morphology/stems/propernoun.lexc
LEXICON names
The indeclattr ;
Den% Danske% Bank%   indeclorg ;
Færøerne indeclplc ;
Vestmannasund propnoun-plc-h3 ;
Norðurlandahús propnoun-plc-h11 ;
Norröna:Norrön propnoun-org-kv1 ;
Eyðun propnoun-fem-kv2 ;
Ráð propnoun-h4 ;
Býráð propnoun-h4 ;
Borðoy 	  SUDUROY ;
Fugloy 	  SUDUROY ;
Skúvoy 	  SUDUROY ;
Kambsdalur:Kambsdal propnoun-plc-k6 ;
Framburðs FLOKKUR ; 
Innan FLOKKUR ; 
Sjálvsstýris FLOKKUR ; 
Tinganes propnoun-plc-h11e ;
Akr:Akrar propnoun-k-flt20 ;
Akrar propnoun-k-flt20 ;
Aldafaðir propnoun-k43e;
Argir propnoun-h-flt25 ;
Avstralia propnoun-h1e ;
C-vitamin propnoun-kv2 ;
Danmørk propnoun-kv13e ;
Depil propnoun-k21 ;
Dimitri maltag ;
Dávur:Dáv DÁVUR ;
E-vitamin propnoun-kv2 ;
Edny RUT ;
Eimskip  neuorgtag ;
Einunna:Einunn ROMA ;
Eiði:Eið propnoun-h24 ;
Elida:Elid ASTA ;
Evropa propnoun-h1e ;
Eysturlond propnoun-h-flt8 ;
Eyði:Eyð ARI ;
Fjareystur propnoun-h13e ;
Fjón propnoun-h3e ;
Flandern plctag ;
Fríðbjørn BJØRN ;
Følling surtag ;
Gablatíð propnoun-kv2e ;
Geirolvur:Geirolv DAGUR ;
Glyvrar propnoun-kv-flt17 ;
Grias BOAS ;
Góðvónarhøvd:Góðvónarhøvdi propnoun-k1e ;
Gøsta MUSTAFA ;
Gøtugjógv propnoun-kv21 ;
Harri:Harr HARRIGUD ;
Hellur propnoun-kv-flt1 ;
Heming maltag ;
Hermóður:Hermóð HÁVARÐUR ;
Hjørtur:Hjørt TRÓNDUR ;
Ho WILLY ;
Hornalond propnoun-h-flt8 ;
Hov propnoun-h3 ;
Hvannasund propnoun-h3 ;
Hágar SARA ;
Hávarður:Hávarð HÁVARÐUR ;
Høskuldur:Høskuld DAGUR ;
Húsavík propnoun-kv6 ;
Indiahav propnoun-h5e ;
Inger-Lise RUT ;
Internet propnoun-h3e ;
Jesuspáp:Jesuspápi propnoun-k1e ;
Jimmi:Jimm ARI ;
Jorsalir:Jorsalir propnoun-k-flt17 ;
Julia:Juli ASTA ;
Jóannes BOAS ;
Kantala surtag ;
Karlskoga:Karlskog ROMA ;
Keypmannhavn fplctag ;
Kirkja:Kirkj propnoun-kv1e ;
Kirkjubøur:Kirkjubø propnoun-k12 ;
Klettafjøll propnoun-h-flt10 ;
Kolbanargjógv propnoun-kv21 ;
Kolbjørn BJØRN ;
Kollafjørður:Kollafjørð propnoun-k46 ;
Koltur propnoun-h13 ;
Kustaa MUSTAFA ;
Kvelland propnoun-h8e ;
Kvenvær plctag ;
Kyrrahav propnoun-h5e ;
Lambi:Lamb propnoun-k3 ;
Langasandur:Langasand propnoun-k7 ;
Langfjordhavn propnoun-kv2e ;
Litava propnoun-h1e ;
Mariurokkur:Mariurokk propnoun-k9 ;
Mikladalur:Mikladal propnoun-k17 ;
Miklagarður:Miklagarð propnoun-k8 ;
Miðeystur propnoun-h13e ;
Miðgarður:Miðgarð propnoun-k8 ;
Miðvágur:Miðvág propnoun-k6 ;
Morskranes propnoun-h11e ;
Mykines propnoun-h11 ;
Nemus BOAS ;
Nes propnoun-h11 ;
Norðanland propnoun-h8 ;
Norðdepil propnoun-k21 ;
Norðhavið propnoun-h4e ;
Norðlond propnoun-h-flt8 ;
Norðoyri propnoun-kv32e ;
Norðragøta:Norðragøt propnoun-kv1 ;
Norðsjógvurin propnoun-k39e ;
Norðskáli:Norðskál propnoun-k1 ;
Norðstjørnan:Norðstjørnan propnoun-kv1e ;
Norðurlandaráðið:Norðurlandaráðið propnoun-h24e ;
Norðuroyggjar propnoun-kv-flt6 ;
Nøríki:Nørík propnoun-h25 ;
Omar maltag ;
Orknoyggjar propnoun-kv-flt8 ;
Oyri propnoun-kv32e ;
Oyvindur:Oyvind TRÓNDUR ;
Paavo WILLY ;
Porkeri:Porker propnoun-h24 ;
Portugal propnoun-h4e ;
Runavík propnoun-kv6 ;
Räihä surtag ;
Rúmaríki:Rúmarík propnoun-h25 ;
Saksun propnoun-kv3 ;
Saltnes propnoun-h11e ;
Sandur:Sand propnoun-k7 ;
Signabøur:Signabø propnoun-k12 ;
Signora:Signor ASTA ;
Sikiloyggj propnoun-kv6e ;
Sissal RUT ;
Skag:Skagi propnoun-k3e ;
Skarð propnoun-h5 ;
Skopun propnoun-kv3 ;
Skálafjørður:Skálafjørð propnoun-k46 ;
Skáli:Skál propnoun-k1 ;
Slættanes propnoun-h11 ;
Sosialurin mscorgtag ;
Strendur propnoun-kv-flt9 ;
Strond propnoun-kv9 ;
Suðuroyggjar:Suðuroy propnoun-kv-flt6 ;
Sviaríki:Sviarík propnoun-h24e ;
Svínáir propnoun-kv-flt2 ;
Svøríki:Svørík propnoun-h25 ;
Syðradalur:Syðradal propnoun-k17 ;
Syðrugøta:Syðrugøt propnoun-kv1 ;
Sára SARA ;
Sørvágur:Sørvág propnoun-k6 ;
Toftir propnoun-kv-flt2 ;
Tolsa:Tols ROMA ;
Tormóður:Tormóð HÁVARÐUR ;
Torny WILLY ;
Tróndarbók propnoun-kv12e ;
Trøllanes propnoun-h11e ;
Tyrni:Tyrn ARI ;
Tórður:Tórð TRÓNDUR ;
Týskland propnoun-h8 ;
Uppland propnoun-h8e ;
Valbjørn BJØRN ;
Valhøll propnoun-kv3e ;
Vatnsoyrar propnoun-kv-flt32 ;
Velbastaður:Velbastað propnoun-k14 ;
Viking orgtag ;
Vinmonopolet plctag ;
Viðareiði:Viðareið propnoun-h24 ;
Vígbrandur:Vígbrand DAGUR ;
Åge MUSTAFA ;
STíF orgtag ;
DeCode orgtag ;
